Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-142.04
Reconstructed vehicle; application for certificate of title; procedure.

The owner of a vehicle which was manufactured or assembled more than thirty years prior to application for a certificate of title with one or more major component parts replaced by replacement parts, other than replacement parts that are essentially the same in design and material to that originally supplied by the manufacturer for the specific year, make, and model of vehicle, may apply for a certificate of title by presenting a certificate of title for one major component part, a notarized bill of sale for all other major component parts replaced, a statement that an inspection has been conducted on the vehicle, and a vehicle identification number as described in section 60-148. The certificate of title shall indicate the year the vehicle resembles, the make the vehicle resembles, and the model the vehicle resembles and shall be branded as reconstructed.

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 20.